Utah statutes.
63H-1-403.5.   Amendment to a project area plan.
(1)  The authority may amend a project area plan by following the same
procedure under this part as applies to the adoption of a project area plan.
(2)  The provisions of this part apply to the authority's adoption of an
amendment to a project area plan to the same extent as they apply to the
adoption of a project area plan.
